Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3525
Care and services;
costs and fees; collection; disposition.

Costs
and fees collected for care and services rendered by a county hospital or
a hospital district hospital shall be deposited in a fund for the exclusive
use by the appropriate county hospital or
hospital district for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the hospital.

Laws 1971, LB 908, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.73;

Laws 2012, LB995, § 11.